West Virginia, session 2025, SB398.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 30, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-38-9 of this code, modified by the Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 7, 2024, relating to the Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board (renewal of licensure or certification, 190 CSR 03), is authorized.